Washington statutes.
RCW 18.83.035

Examining board—Composition—Terms—Chairperson.

There is created the examining board of psychology which shall examine the qualifications of applicants for licensing. The board shall consist of nine psychologists and two public members, all appointed by the governor. The public members shall not be and have never been psychologists or in training to be psychologists; they may not have any household member who is a psychologist or in training to be a psychologist; they may not participate or ever have participated in a commercial or professional field related to psychology, nor have a household member who has so participated; and they may not have had within two years before appointment a substantial financial interest in a person regulated by the board. Each psychologist member of the board shall have actively practiced psychology in the state of Washington for at least three years immediately preceding appointment and who is licensed under this chapter. Board members shall be appointed for a term of five years, except that the terms of the existing appointees shall be adjusted by the governor so that no more than two members' terms expire each year with all subsequent appointments for a five-year term. Upon the death, resignation, or removal of a member, the governor shall appoint a successor to serve for the unexpired term. The board shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.

[ 2022 c 240 s 10; 1989 c 226 s 1; 1986 c 27 s 2; 1984 c 279 s 76.]

NOTES:

Severability—1984 c 279: See RCW 18.130.901.